trunk/apertium-oldca-XX/apertium-oldca-XX.oldca.dix
    <pardef n="A_CREURE">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>creure</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>creyre</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cregu</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="partpi"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl_femT"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cre</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_ent_ger"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cre</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_i_cons"/>
        <p>
          <l>ent</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_ent_ger"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>crec</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cre</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="PresInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PresInd_u"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cre</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>crei</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>crehi</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpInd_vocal"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>crei</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpInd_vocal"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cresi</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpInd_vocal"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cre</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_í"/>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl12"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>crèie</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl12"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cresie</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl12"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cregu</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="IndefInd_4"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cresegu</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="IndefInd_4"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>creec</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>creeguère</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl12"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>creegueren</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl12"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>creu</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="FutInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="Fut"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>creur</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="CondInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="Cond"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cre</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="PresSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PresSubj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>creg</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="PresSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PresSubj_g"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>creseg</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="PresSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PresSubj_g"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>creeg</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="PresSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PresSubj_g"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cresa</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="PresSubj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>creses</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="PresSubj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cresa</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="PresSubj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cregu</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_s"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cregue</l>
          <r>creurer<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_s23"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>creeg</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_ra"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cre</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_è"/>
        <p>
          <l>gre</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl12"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cregue</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_ra"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cregu</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_è"/>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl12"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>credegu</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_s"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>credegue</l>
          <r>creurer<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_s23"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cresegu</l>
          <r>creure<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_s"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cresegue</l>
          <r>creurer<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ImpSubj_s23"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

      <e>
        <par n="A_CREURE"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>des</i>
        <par n="A_CREURE"/>
      </e>
